Utah statutes.
78B-8-202.   Punitive damages -- Notification procedure.
(1)  Whenever it appears from a return of a jury verdict in any court jury
trial or from entry of a finding or order in any court bench trial, that
punitive damages have been awarded to the plaintiff in a court action, the
clerk of the court shall immediately notify the attorney general and state
treasurer of the verdict, finding, or order.  The notice shall contain:
(a)  the names of both parties to the action, and their attorneys;
(b)  the case number; and
(c)  the location of the court.
(2)  In addition to the notice required in Subsection (1) of this section, the
clerk of the court shall notify the attorney general and the state treasurer
within five days after entry of a judgment award of punitive damages.  The
notice shall contain:
(a)  the name of the party and his attorney, against whom the judgment was
ordered;
(b)  the amount of the judgment; and
(c)  the date on which the judgment was entered.
